Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.466

Rental car business.

"Rental car business" means a person engaging within this state in the business of renting rental cars, as determined under rules of the department of licensing.

[ 1992 c 194 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1992 c 194: "(1) Sections 1 through 3 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 1, 1992.

(2) Sections 4 through 13 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1993." [ 1992 c 194 s 14.]